North Dakota statutes. TITLE 53 Sports and Amusements
CHAPTER 53-01 Commissioner of Combative Sports

53-01-01.
Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 484, § 13.

53-01-01.1.
Mixed fighting style competition — Definition .

As used in this chapter, “mixed fighting style competition” means an advertised or professionally promoted exhibition or contest for which any type of admission fee is charged and in which participants who inflict or employ kicks, punches, blows, holds, and other techniques to injure, stun, choke, incapacitate, or disable an opponent. The techniques may include a combination of boxing, kickboxing, wrestling, grappling, or other recognized martial arts. Boxing and kickboxing exhibitions or contests without the combination of other techniques do not constitute mixed fighting style competitions.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 464, § 1; 2021, ch. 385, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

53-01-02.
Administration by secretary of state — Appointment of commission of combative sports.

The secretary of state shall act as state commissioner of combative sports and administer this chapter. The secretary of state may appoint a commission of combative sports to assist and advise the secretary of state in matters relating to the regulation of boxing, kickboxing, mixed fighting style competition, and sparring. The secretary of state shall define the duties of the commission. Commission members are not entitled to compensation, except for reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses at the same rate as allowed state employees incurred in performing their official duties.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 91, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 53-0102; S.L. 1967, ch. 74, § 13; 1971, ch. 484, § 1; 1991, ch. 543, § 1; 2005, ch. 464, § 2; 2011, ch. 377, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 377, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

53-01-03.
Restrictions.

The secretary of state may not promote, directly or indirectly, any boxing, kickboxing, mixed fighting style competition, or sparring exhibition, engage in the managing of any boxer, kickboxer, or mixed style fighter, or be interested in any manner in the proceeds from any boxing, kickboxing, mixed fighting style competition, or sparring exhibition.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 91, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 53-0103; S.L. 1971, ch. 484, § 2; 1991, ch. 543, § 2; 2005, ch. 464, § 3.

53-01-04.
Commissioners — Reimbursement for expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 484, § 13.

53-01-05.
Boxing and wrestling commissioner — Appointment — Duties — Salary — Expenses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 484, § 13.

53-01-06.
Official bond of boxing and wrestling commissioner. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 484, § 13.

53-01-07.
Duties of state commissioner of combative sports.

The secretary of state shall supervise all boxing, kickboxing, mixed fighting style competitions, or sparring exhibitions held in the state and may:

Adopt rules governing the conduct of boxing, kickboxing, mixed fighting style competitions, and sparring exhibitions.

Establish license fees for all boxers, kickboxers, mixed style fighters, boxing, kickboxing, and mixed fighting style competition promoters, managers, judges, timekeepers, cornerpersons, knockdown counters, matchmakers, and referees or other participants.

Charge a fee equal to the actual cost incurred to regulate the competitions and exhibitions.

Adopt rules allowing the secretary of state to perform screening tests for controlled substances, as defined in section 19-03.1-01, on boxers, kickboxers, and mixed style fighters participating in a competition or an exhibition.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 91, § 5; 1939, ch. 98, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 53-0107; S.L. 1971, ch. 484, § 3; 1987, ch. 607, § 1; 1989, ch. 609, § 1; 1991, ch. 543, § 3; 1995, ch. 483, § 1; 1997, ch. 426, § 1; 2005, ch. 464, § 4; 2007, ch. 445, § 1; 2011, ch. 377, § 2; 2017, ch. 358, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 385, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 377, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 445, S.L. 2007 became effective March 6, 2007, pursuant to section 2 of chapter 445, S.L. 2007.

53-01-08.
Biennial report to governor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 543, § 8.

53-01-09.
Fees paid into special fund — Continuing appropriation.

All fees collected by the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter must be deposited in a special fund maintained in the state treasury. All money deposited in the fund is appropriated as a continuing appropriation to the secretary of state for administering this chapter and for the compensation and expenses of members of the commission of combative sports.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 91, § 6; 1939, ch. 98, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 53-0109; S.L. 1971, ch. 484, § 5; 1987, ch. 607, § 2; 1991, ch. 543, § 4; 2005, ch. 464, § 5; 2011, ch. 377, § 3.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 377, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

53-01-10.
Application for license — Terms of license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 543, § 8.

53-01-11.
Bond required with application for license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 607, § 10.

53-01-12.
Annual license fee for exhibitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 543, § 8.

53-01-13.
Restrictions on licensee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 543, § 8.

53-01-14.
Books and records of exhibitor open to inspection — Canceling license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 607, § 10.

53-01-15.
Licensing of boxers, managers, and referees — Fee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 543, § 8.

53-01-16.
Amateur and professional exhibitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 543, § 8.

53-01-17.
Exhibitions also governed by local ordinance.

Boxing, kickboxing, or sparring exhibitions may not be held in cities in which such contests or exhibitions are declared illegal by ordinance. All boxing, kickboxing, mixed fighting style competitions, or sparring exhibitions held in any city in this state must be held in conformity with the ordinances of the city in addition to the requirements under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 91, § 15; R.C. 1943, § 53-0117; 1991, ch. 543, § 5; 2005, ch. 464, § 6.

53-01-18.
Certain exhibitions exempt.

All boxing or sparring exhibitions conducted by bona fide educational institutions or by national amateur boxing associations or their local affiliates are exempt from this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 91, § 16; R.C. 1943, § 53-0118; S.L. 1975, ch. 460, § 1; 1987, ch. 607, § 8; 1991, ch. 543, § 6; 2003, ch. 448, § 1.

53-01-19.
Penalty.

A person who violates this chapter or any rule adopted by the secretary of state is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1935, ch. 91, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 53-0119; S.L. 1971, ch. 484, § 12; 1975, ch. 106, § 567; 1987, ch. 607, § 9; 1991, ch. 543, § 7.